Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF595.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 SF 595 (3) 91 ll/js/mb S.F. 595 Section 1. Section 103A.11, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. The text of any proposed rule shall be made available 3 for inspection at the office of the commissioner and shall be 4 distributed to the governmental subdivisions which have adopted 5 the state building code, and to any other person who requests 6 a copy. A proposed rule affecting the state building code 7 shall consider housing affordability and shall include a public 8 report submitted by the commissioner to the administrative 9 rules review committee outlining the estimated increase or 10 decrease in construction costs to single-family or multi-family 11 homes resulting from the promulgation of the proposed rule. 12 Sec. 2. Section 105.17, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 13 2025, is amended to read as follows: 14 b. On and after July 1, 2008, a governmental subdivision 15 shall not prohibit a contractor or a plumbing, mechanical, 16 HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic professional 17 licensed pursuant to this chapter from performing services 18 for which that person is licensed pursuant to this chapter 19 or enforce any contractor or plumbing , and mechanical , 20 HVAC-refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic professional 21 licensing provisions promulgated by the governmental 22 subdivision against a person licensed pursuant to this chapter . 23 Sec. 3. Section 331.301, subsection 6, paragraph b, Code 24 2025, is amended to read as follows: 25 b. A county shall not impose any fee or charge on any 26 individual or business licensed by the plumbing and mechanical 27 systems board for the right to perform plumbing, mechanical, 28 HVAC, refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic systems work 29 within the scope of the license. A county shall not require 30 the issuance of a license or impose a license fee or charge on 31 any individual or business defined as a âgeneral contractorâ 32 as defined in section 572.1, subsection 3, or âsubcontractorâ 33 as defined in section 572.1, subsection 11, unless otherwise 34 required by state or federal law . This paragraph does 35 -1- SF 595 (3) 91 ll/js/mb 1/ 3 S.F. 595 not prohibit a county from charging fees for the issuance 1 of permits for, and inspections of, work performed in its 2 jurisdiction. 3 Sec. 4. Section 331.301, subsection 25, paragraph c, Code 4 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 5 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) Notwithstanding any other provision 6 of law to the contrary, a county shall not adopt or enforce an 7 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment, or use any other 8 means relating to the stormwater management methods required 9 at a construction site, that imposes additional improvements 10 or methods more restrictive than those required as part of the 11 countyâs initial review and approval of a proposed subdivision 12 plat, lot, or parcel as required by section 354.8 unless 13 otherwise required by another state or federal law. A county 14 may develop standards to evaluate stormwater management methods 15 before and after construction and ensure compliance with other 16 state or federal laws. 17 Sec. 5. Section 364.3, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, 18 is amended to read as follows: 19 b. A city shall not impose any fee or charge on any 20 individual or business licensed by the plumbing and mechanical 21 systems board for the right to perform plumbing, mechanical, 22 HVAC, refrigeration, sheet metal, or hydronic systems work 23 within the scope of the license. A city shall not require the 24 issuance of a license or impose a license fee or charge on 25 any individual or business defined as a âgeneral contractorâ 26 as defined in section 572.1, subsection 3, or âsubcontractorâ 27 as defined in section 572.1, subsection 11, unless otherwise 28 required by state or federal law . This paragraph does not 29 prohibit a city from charging fees for the issuance of permits 30 for, and inspections of, work performed in its jurisdiction. 31 Sec. 6. Section 364.3, subsection 19, paragraph c, Code 32 2025, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 33 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) Notwithstanding any other provision 34 of law to the contrary, a city shall not adopt or enforce an 35 -2- SF 595 (3) 91 ll/js/mb 2/ 3 S.F. 595 ordinance, motion, resolution, or amendment, or use any other 1 means relating to the stormwater management methods required 2 at a construction site, that imposes additional improvements 3 or methods more restrictive than those required as part of the 4 cityâs initial review and approval of a proposed subdivision 5 plat, lot, or parcel as required by section 354.8 unless 6 otherwise required by another state or federal law. A city may 7 develop standards to evaluate stormwater management methods 8 before and after construction and ensure compliance with other 9 state or federal laws. 10 -3- SF 595 (3) 91 ll/js/mb 3/ 3